Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 190A Recreational Vehicle Sales
190A.130.
Coercion of recreational vehicle dealer by manufacturer prohibited.

As used in this section, the term “coerce” includes but is not limited to:

Threatening to terminate or not renew a dealer agreement without good cause; and

Threatening to withhold line-makes or other product lines the dealer is entitled to display and sell under the dealer agreement or delay delivery of recreational vehicles as an inducement to amend the dealer agreement.

A recreational vehicle manufacturer shall not coerce or attempt to coerce a dealer to purchase a product or service that the dealer did not order.

A recreational vehicle manufacturer shall not coerce a dealer to enter into any agreement with the manufacturer.

A recreational vehicle manufacturer shall not coerce or attempt to coerce a dealer to enter into an agreement with the manufacturer or any other person that requires the dealer to submit any disputes by the dealer to binding arbitration or otherwise waive the rights or responsibilities of the dealer under the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 27, § 13, effective January 1, 2015.

190A.140.
Penalty for violation of chapter.

Any person who violates or causes, aids, or abets any violation of any provision of this chapter shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or imprisoned for not more than thirty (30) days, or both.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 27, § 14, effective January 1, 2015.